Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.618

Credit card marketing policies.

(1)(a) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, institutions of higher education shall develop policies regarding the marketing or merchandising of credit cards on institutional property to students, except as provided in newspapers, magazines, or similar publications or within any location of a financial services business regularly doing business on the institution's property.

(b) "Merchandising" means the offering of free merchandise or incentives to students as part of the credit card marketing effort.

(c) "Student" means any student enrolled for one or more credit hours at an institution of higher education.

(2) Institutions of higher education shall each develop official credit card marketing policies. The process of development of these policies must include consideration of student comments. The official credit card marketing policies must, at a minimum, include consideration of and decisions regarding:

(a) The registration of credit card marketers;

(b) Limitations on the times and locations of credit card marketing; and

(c) Prohibitions on material inducements to complete a credit card application unless the student has been provided credit card debt education literature, which includes, but is not limited to, brochures of written or electronic information.

(3)(a) The policies shall include the following elements: A requirement for credit card marketers to inform students about good credit management practices through programs developed in concert with the institution of higher education; and

(b) A requirement to make the official credit card marketing policy available to all students upon their request.

[ 2005 c 74 s 1.]